Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.005

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Acquiring person" means a person acquiring or seeking to acquire control of a state trust company, directly or indirectly.

(2) "Control," "controls," "controlled," and "controlling" mean:

(a) The ownership of or ability or power to vote, directly, acting through one or more other persons, or otherwise indirectly, twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding shares of a class of voting securities of a state trust company or other company;

(b) The ability to control the election of a majority of the board of a state trust company or other company;

(c) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of the state trust company or other company as determined by the director after notice and an opportunity for hearing; or

(d) The conditioning of the transfer of twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding shares or participation shares of a class of voting securities of a state trust company on the transfer of twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding shares of a class of voting securities of another state trust company or other company.

(3) "Merger" includes consolidation.

(4) "Merging trust company" means a party to a merger.

(5) "Resulting trust company" means the trust company resulting from a merger.

[ 2019 c 389 s 93; 2014 c 37 s 388.]